Utah statutes.
32A-11-104 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission and department duties before
issuing licenses.
(1)  Before any beer wholesaling license is issued by the commission, the
department shall conduct an investigation and may hold public hearings for the
purpose of gathering information and making recommendations to the commission
as to whether or not a license should be granted.  The information shall be
forwarded to the commission to aid in its determination.
(2)  Before issuing any beer wholesaling license, the commission shall:
(a)  determine that the applicant has complied with all basic qualifications
and requirements for making application for a license as provided by Sections
32A-11-102 and 32A-11-103, and that the application is complete;
(b)  consider the applicant's ability to manage and operate a beer wholesaling
operation, including but not limited to management experience, past
wholesaling experience, the brands the applicant intends to wholesale, and the
means the applicant intends to use to distribute beer;
(c)  consider the physical characteristics of the premises where it is
proposed that beer be stored by the applicant, such as location, proximity to
transportation, and condition, size, and security of the premises; and
(d)  consider any other factors or circumstances it considers necessary.
